Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.200

State preemption.

The state of Washington hereby fully occupies and preempts the entire field of regulation of scrap metal processors, recyclers, or suppliers within the boundaries of the state. Any political subdivision in this state may enact or enforce only those laws and ordinances relating to the regulation of scrap metal processors, recyclers, or suppliers that are specifically authorized by state law and are consistent with this chapter. Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit the authority of any political subdivision to impose generally applicable zoning, land use, permitting, general business licensing, environmental, and health and safety requirements or authorized business taxes upon scrap metal processors, recyclers, or suppliers within their jurisdictions. Local ordinances pertaining specifically to scrap metal processors, recyclers, or suppliers shall have the same or lesser penalty as provided for by state law. Local scrap metal laws and ordinances that are inconsistent with, more restrictive than, or exceed the requirements of state law shall not be enacted and are hereby preempted and repealed, regardless of the code, charter, or home rule status of such political subdivision.

[ 2013 c 322 s 22.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Implementation—2013 c 322 ss 12-23: See notes following RCW 19.290.100.